dev/segmenter/apertium-kaz.kaz-seg.twol
Alphabet
 А Ә Б В Г Ғ Д Е Ё Ж З И І Й К Қ Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ұ Ү Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ы Ъ Э Ю Я
 а ә б в г ғ д е ё ж з и і й к қ л м н ң о ө п р с т у ұ ү ф х һ ц ч ш щ ь ы ъ э ю я
 %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9
 %{K%}:к %{l%}:л %{L%}:л %{M%}:м %{N%}:н %{G%}:г %{D%}:д  ! Cns
 %{S%}:с %{n%}:н %{y%}:ы %{o%}:0 %{д%}:0 %{т%}:0 %{ъ%}:0 %{ь%}:0  ! disappearing stuff
 %{A%}:а %{I%}:ы %{E%}:а ! Vow
 ° %% %, %. %- %    ! punctuation and boundaries

! %>:·
 %>:%>

 !!! These are needed for the phonology of numbers, alphabetisms, and acronyms
 !!! They trigger relevant phonology and disappear
 %{а%}:0 %{э%}:0 %{ә%}:ә
 %{й%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{н%}:0 %{з%}:0 %{с%}:0

 ! Russian words:
 %{☭%}:0 %{і%}:і

 ! Obstacles on the road!!
 %{❗%}:0 ;

Sets

Vow =      А Ә Е Ё І И О Ө У Ү Ұ Ы Э Ю Я
           а ә е ё і и о ө у ү ұ ы э ю я
           %{A%} %{I%} %{E%} %{y%}
           %{а%} %{э%} ;

LowVow =   А Ә Е О Ө
           а ә е о ө ;

HighVow =  І Ү Ы Ұ
           і ү ы ұ ;

YotVow = Я я Е е Ё ё Ю ю ;

VowRight = А Ә Е Ё І О Ө Ү Ұ Ы Э Я
           а ә е ё і о ө ү ұ ы э я
           %{A%} %{I%} %{E%} ;

FrontVow = Ә Е І Ө Ү Э
           ә е і ө ү э
           %{э%} ;

BackVow = А О Ұ Ы Я Ё
          а о ұ ы я ё
          %{а%} ;

! FIXME: These can be front or back vowels :(
VCdigraphs = У И Ю
             у и ю ;

CVdigraphs = Е Ё Ю Я
             е ё ю я ;
            ! е is only CV after vowels; others only occur after vowels

Cns =      Б В Г Ғ Д Ж З Й К Қ Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ
           б в г ғ д ж з й к қ л м н ң п р с т ф х һ ц ч ш щ ь ъ
           %{D%} %{K%} %{G%} %{N%} %{L%} %{M%} %{S%} %{n%} ; ! %- ;

CnsRight = Б В Г Ғ Д Ж З И Й К Қ Л М Н Ң П Р С Т У Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ Ю
           б в г ғ д ж з и й к қ л м н ң п р с т у ф х һ ц ч ш щ ь ъ ю
           %{D%} %{K%} %{G%} %{N%} %{L%} %{M%} %{S%} %{n%} ; ! %- ;

AbstrCns = %{й%} %{л%} %{н%} %{з%} %{с%} ;

Abstract = %{а%} %{э%} %{й%} %{л%} %{н%} %{з%} %{с%} ;

HighSonCns = Й У Р И Ю
             й у р и ю ;

Liquid = Л
         л ;

Nasals = М Н Ң
         м н ң ;

! FIXME: There are a few "native" Kazakh words with ж as voiced also
VoicedObstruents = Ғ З
                   ғ з ;

! These are all voiceless when word-final, many only in borrowings
VoicelessCns = Б В П Ф Д Т Ц Ж Ш Щ Ч С Г Х К Қ Һ
               б в п ф д т ц ж ш щ ч с г х к қ һ
               %{с%} ;

AbstrVoicelessCns = %{с%} ;

AbstrVoicedCns = %{й%} %{л%} %{н%} %{з%} ;

FrontCns = К Г Ь
           к г ь ;

BackCns  = Қ Ғ
           қ ғ ;

Rules

!!!! Desonorisation !!!!

"N Desonorisation"
%{N%}:д <=> [ :HighSonCns | :Liquid | :Nasals | :VoicedObstruents ] [ %>: | %{☭%}:0 | т:0 | д:0 | с:0 | :ь ]* _ ;
                                        [ %{й%}: | %{л%}: | %{н%}: | %{з%}: ]/[ %-: | %%: | %>: ] _ ;
            except
                    :Nasals/[ [ :0 - Abstract:0 ] | %>: ]  _ :Vow :Nasals ;
                     %{n%}: %>: _ ;

"L Desonorisation"
%{L%}:д <=> [ :Liquid | :Nasals | :VoicedObstruents ] [ %>: | %{☭%}:0 | т:0 | д:0 | с:0 | :ь ]* _ ;
                                                   [ %{л%}: | %{н%}: | %{з%}: ] %>: _ ;

"M Desonorisation"
%{M%}:б <=> [ :Nasals | :VoicedObstruents ]/[ %>: | %  ] _ ;
                                 [ %{н%}: | %{з%}: ] %>: _ ;
            except
                                    :Nasals %>: _ Vow :Nasals ;

!!!! Nasal harmony !!!!
"D nasal harmony"
%{D%}:н <=> :Nasals/[ [ :0 - Abstract:0 ] | %>: ] _ :Vow :Nasals ;
            %{n%}:0 %>: _ Vow :Nasals ;
            %{н%}:0 [ %-: | %>: ]* _ Vow :Nasals ;

!!!! Assimilation !!!!

"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> :VoicelessCns/[ %>: | т:0 | д:0 | с:0 | %  | %{☭%}:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] _ ;
          AbstrVoicelessCns:/[ %-: | %>: ] _ ;
          where Cx in ( %{M%}  %{D%}  %{L%}  %{N%} )
                Cy in (   п      т      т      т   )
                matched;

"Voicing assimilation of front G"
%{G%}:к <=> [ :FrontVow | :и | :у | %{э%}: ] [ :Cns* [ :VoicelessCns - :BackCns ] ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ ы:0 | Abstract:0 ] ] ] _ ;
                                                      [ :VoicelessCns & :FrontCns ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ ы:0 | Abstract:0 ] ] ] _ ;
                                                                                            [ %{э%}: %{с%}: ]/[ %>: | :%- ] _ ;
             except
!                                                                 [ ы:0 [ :и | :у ] :Cns* [ :VoicelessCns - :BackCns ] ]/%>: _ ;
!      [ .#. :Cns* :у [ :Cns - :FrontCns ]* ]/[ %>: | [ :0  - ь:0 ] ] _ ;
!                        [ :BackVow :у [ :Cns - :FrontCns]* ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
!                        [ ы:0 [ :и | :у ] [ :Cns - :FrontCns]* ]/%>: _ ;
!                             [ :у %{☭%}:0/[ :Cns - :FrontCns ] ]/%>: _ ;
                             [ :у :Cns* [ :VoicelessCns - :FrontCns ]/%{☭%}:0 ]/%>: _ ;



"Voicing assimilation of back G"
%{G%}:қ <=> [ :BackVow | ы:0 ] [ :Cns* [ :VoicelessCns - :FrontCns ] ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 - %{☭%}:0 ] ] | т:0 | д:0 | с:0 ] _ ;
                                                                     [ %{а%}: %{с%}: ]/[ %>: | :%- ] _ ;
                             [ :у :Cns* [ :VoicelessCns - :FrontCns ]/%{☭%}:0 ]/%>: _ ;
!            except
!    [ :BackVow [ :и | :у ]/:Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{☭%}:0 ] ] _ ;

"Voicing assimilation of G across space"
%{G%}:қ <=> [ :VoicelessCns | %{с%}: ] %  _ ;

"Normal G across space"
%{G%}:ғ <=> %  _ ;
            except
                   [ :VoicelessCns | %{с%}: ] %  _ ;

"Intervocalic voicing of п"
п:б <=> :Vow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;
        except
               [ :LowVow ]/[ :0 ] _ %>: [ :HighVow :п ]/[ :0 ] ;

"Lenition of п to у in Ip forms"
п:у <=> [ :LowVow ]/[ :0 ] _ %>: [ :HighVow :п ]/[ :0 ] ;

"Intervocalic voicing of к/қ"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          except
            %{❗%}:0 _ ;
          where Cx in ( к қ )
                Cy in ( г ғ )
                matched;

!!!! Dissimilation !!!!

"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/"
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

!!!! Vowel Harmony !!!!

"I Vowel Harmony"
%{I%}:і <=> [ [ :FrontVow | :и ] :Cns* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
!            [ :FrontVow [ :Cns | :и | :у ]* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
                 [ :и :Cns* :CnsRight %{☭%}:0 ]/[ %>: | т:0 | д:0 | с:0 ] _ ;
                 [ %{э%}:0 [ :Cns | AbstrCns: ]* ]/[ %>: | %-: | %{S%}: ] _ ;
     [ :FrontCns :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
  [ .#. :Cns* :и [ :Cns | :ю ]* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
  [ :FrontVow :у/:Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{☭%}:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] | %>: ] _ ;
            :BackVow %{э%}:0/[ :CnsRight | :Cns | [ [ :0 - %{э%}:0 ] | %>: ] ] _ ;
!                    ь:0 [ :0 - ь: ]* _ ;
!                 FrontCns:0 [ :0 - FrontCns: ]* _ ;
                  ь:0 %{☭%}: %>: %{S%}: _ ;
            except
                                                %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
                                 [ :BackCns ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - ь:0 ] ] _ ;
      [ .#. :Cns* :у [ :Cns - :FrontCns ]* ]/[ %>: | [ :0  - ь:0 ] ] _ ;
                        [ :BackVow :у [ :Cns - :FrontCns]* ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
!                                                 [ й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                                             %{o%}:0 _ ;
                        [ ы:0 [ :и | :у ] [ :Cns - :FrontCns]* ]/%>: _ ;
                             [ :у %{☭%}:0/[ :Cns - :FrontCns ] ]/%>: _ ;
 [ [ :BackVow | :BackCns] [ :и | :у | :ю ]*/[ :Cns - :FrontCns ]* ]/[ %>: | :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{☭%}:0 | ь:0 ] ] _ ;

!ь:0 <=> _ %>: [ :Vow ]/[ :0 ] ;

"A Vowel Harmony"
%{A%}:е <=> [ [ :FrontVow | :и ] :Cns* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] | %  ] _ ;
!            [ [ :FrontVow | :и | :у ] :Cns* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] | %  ] _ ;
!            [ :FrontVow [ :Cns | :и | :у ]* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] | %  ] _ ;
           [ %{э%}:0 :Cns* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | %-: | AbstrCns: | %{S%}: ] _ ;
                                    [ %{э%}:0 AbstrCns:0* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         [ :FrontCns :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
        [ .#. [ :Cns - :BackCns ]* :и :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
!                                      [ [ :Cns - :BackCns ] :и ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
       [ :FrontVow :у/:Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{☭%}:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] _ ;
  [ .#. :Cns* :и [ :Cns | :ю ]* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
!                                         [ :FrontCns :и ]/[ :0 - %{ъ%}: ] _ ;
            except
                                                [ :BackCns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                      [ .#. :Cns* :у [ :Cns - :FrontCns ]* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                            [ :BackVow :у [ :Cns - :FrontCns ]* ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
                                                           [ й: ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
                                            [ ы:0 [ :и | :у ] :Cns* ]/%>: _ ;
                                  [ :у %{☭%}:0/[ :Cns - :FrontCns ] ]/%>: _ ;
 [ [ :BackVow | :BackCns] [ :и | :у | :ю ]*/[ :Cns - :FrontCns ]* ]/[ %>: | :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{☭%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                                               [ :Vow - [ :и | :у ] ] %>: _ ;
                     [ %{ә%}:ә :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %  | :0 - [ Abstract:0 ] ]  _ ;

"E Vowel Harmony"
%{E%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{ъ%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                      [ :FrontCns :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{ъ%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                 ! FIXME: this is supposed to make front vowels after и
                 !        but doesn't seem to work :(
                 !        e.g., и<v><TD><aor><p1><sg>
                 ![ .#. [ :Cns - :қ ]* и ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                    [ [ :Cns - :BackCns ] :и ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
                                      [ .#. [ :Cns - :BackCns ]* :и :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
            except
!                                     :Vow/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;  ! WTF?
                                 :BackVow/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
                                 [ і:0 | ы:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
                                        [ й: ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
   [ :BackVow [ :и | :у ]/:Cns* ]/[ %>: | :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{☭%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                     [ :BackCns :и (%{ъ%}:0) ]/[ %>: ] _ ;


"Harmony of unepenthesised vowel in some stems"
%{y%}:і <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ :Cns [ .#. | :Cns ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
     %{э%}:0/[ [ :0 - %{э%}: ] | :CnsRight ]* _ [ :Cns [ .#. | :Cns ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;


"Turn {E} into й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> [ :VowRight ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            except
                 [ і:0 | ы:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
                   [ й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Turn {E} into и to combine with a і and ы"
%{E%}:и <=> [ і:0 | ы:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
            except
              [ й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

!!! More concise than following two rules, but does it work?
!"Delete і and ы before {E} so that the result can be и"
!і:0 <=> _ [ %{E%} ]/[ %>: ] ;
!        where I in ( і ы ) ;

"Delete і before {E} so that the result can be и"
і:0 <=> _ [ %{E%}: ]/[ %>: ] ;

"Delete ы before {E} so that the result can be и"
ы:0 <=> _ [ %{E%}: ]/[ %>: ] ;

!"A front vowel harmony after и"
!%{A%}:е <=> [ [ :Cns - :BackCns ] :и ]/[ %>: ] _ ;

"A back vowel harmony after и"
%{A%}:я <=> [ :BackCns :и (%{ъ%}:0) ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
                  [ :Cns :и %{ъ%}:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
        except
                   [ :Vow - [ :и | :у ] ] %>: _ ;
!            [ :FrontCns :и ]/[ :0 - %{ъ%}:0 ] _ ;

!"E front vowel harmony after и"
!%{E%}:е <=> [ [ :Cns - :BackCns ] :и ]/[ %>: ] _ ;

"E back vowel harmony after и"
%{E%}:я <=> [ :BackCns :и (%{ъ%}:0) ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
                  [ :Cns :и %{ъ%}:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!   й vowel harmony  !!!!!!!!!!
